Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-341
Discrimination against person refusing to participate in an abortion; injunctive relief.

Any person whose employment or position has in any way been altered, impaired, or terminated because of his refusal to participate in an abortion shall have the right to injunctive relief, including temporary relief, pending trial upon showing of an emergency, in the district court, in accordance with the statutes, rules, and practices applicable in other similar cases.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 56.